Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-814
Direct contracts; approval required, when; report required; criteria; Department of Correctional Services; purchases authorized.

(1) The division may, by written order, permit contracts to be made by any state agency directly with the vendor or supplier whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the division that, because of the unique nature of the personal property, the price in connection therewith, the quantity to be purchased, the location of the state agency, the time of the use of the personal property, or any other circumstance, the interests of the state will be served better by purchasing or contracting direct.

(2) Such permission shall be revocable and shall be operative for a period not exceeding twelve months from the date of issue. Upon the request of the division, state agencies receiving such permission shall report their acts and expenditures under such orders to the division in writing at such time and covering such period as may be required by the division.

(3) The division shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing criteria which must be met by any agency seeking direct market purchase authorization. Purchases for miscellaneous needs may be made directly by any agency without prior approval from the division for purchases of less than fifty thousand dollars if the agency has completed a certification program as prescribed by the division.

(4) The Department of Correctional Services may purchase raw materials, supplies, component parts, and equipment perishables directly for industries established pursuant to section 83-183, whether such purchases are made to fill specific orders or for general inventories. Any such purchase shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The department shall comply with the bidding process of the division and shall be subject to audit by the division for such purchases.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 16, p. 709;

R.S.1943, § 81-160;

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 12, p. 1620;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 9;

Laws 1975, LB 447, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 354, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB256, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB1080, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB320, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2022, § 81-161.03;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 14.